New York, session 2025-2026, S8291.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph c of subdivision 10 of section 163 of the state 2 finance law, as amended by chapter 95 of the laws of 2000, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 c. The commissioner or state agency may elect to award a contract to 5 one or more responsive and responsible offerers provided, however, that 6 the basis for the selection among multiple contracts at the time of 7 purchase shall be the most practical and economical alternative and 8 shall be in the best interests of the state, and further provided that 9 the requirements set forth herein shall not preclude the commissioner 10 from establishing multiple award contracts for reasons including 11 increased opportunities for small businesses to participate in state 12 contracts. To the extent feasible, the commissioner or state agency 13 shall endeavor to divide contracts by size into large, medium, small and 14 micro contracts for the purpose of increasing opportunities for small 15 businesses, including minority-owned business enterprises and women- 16 owned business enterprises as defined in section three hundred ten of 17 the executive law, to participate in state contracts. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to paragraph c 20 of subdivision 10 of section 163 of the state finance law made by 21 section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such section and 22 shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10988-01-5